Missouri, session 2026, HB2013.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated, for the period
beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Section 13.000. An appropriation may be comprised in whole or in part
of a one-time amount, and such one-time amount shall be
construed to be a component part of, and not in addition to, the
stated appropriation amount. Any amount of an appropriation
identified as “one-time” in this act shall not be considered an
addition to any ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal
periods beyond June 30, 2027. Any amount identified as one-
time may, however, be requested in any future fiscal period as a
new decision item.

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2013 2
Section 13.005. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For the payment of real property leases, utilities, systems furniture, and
structural modifications, provided fifteen percent (15%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 13.005, 13.010, and
13.015, further provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is
allowed between Section 13.005 to Section 13.010, further
provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is allowed between and
within departments and one hundred percent (100%) flexibility is
allowed between federal funds within this section, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 13.025
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$378,717
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ..............................................................2,264,607
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) ...................................19,932
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) ............................94,470
From Assistive Technology Federal Fund (1188) ............................................................50,193
From Deaf Relay Service and Equipment Distribution Fund
(1559) ....................................................................................................................35,377
From Charter Public School Commission Revolving Fund (1860) ..................................13,545
From Assistive Technology Loan Revolving Fund (1889) ..............................................15,140
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
Expense and Equipment
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) .....................................................1,680,009
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949) ..........................................................283,769
For the Department of Revenue
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................725,810
For the Department of Revenue
For the State Lottery Commission
Expense and Equipment
From Lottery Enterprise Fund (1657) .............................................................................565,879
For the Office of Administration

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2013 3
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,053,281
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) .......................................483,928
From Office of Administration Revolving Administrative Trust Fund
(1505) ..................................................................................................................495,494
For the Ethics Commission
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................152,112
For the Department of Agriculture
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................300,239
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ......................................................4,362
From Grain Inspection Fee Fund (1647) ..........................................................................51,203
From Petroleum Inspection Fund (1662) ..........................................................................30,421
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ..........................................................................2,457
For the Department of Natural Resources
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................634,964
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .......................................428,952
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267) ......................................................41,291
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ..........................................................................108,529
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) ........................................................37,789
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) .......................................................................112,667
From Natural Resources Protection Fund (1555) .............................................................12,110
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit
Fee Subaccount (1568) .......................................................................................124,749
From Solid Waste Management Fund – Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) ..........................36,630
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) .................................................................184,819
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Asbestos Fee
Subaccount (1584) ................................................................................................26,708
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) .....................................................49,980
From Underground Storage Tank Regulation Program Fund (1586) ...............................15,337
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1594) ..............................................................................................319,766
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ................................................................................165,130
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ...................................................................35,524

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2013 4
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ..............................................................................177,420
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) .........................................................................132,697
For the Department of Economic Development
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................13,771
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) ..............................................1
For the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Expense and Equipment
From Division of Finance Fund (1550) ............................................................................97,375
From Insurance Examiners Fund (1552) ............................................................................8,176
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566) .............................................................................9,527
From Manufactured Housing Fund (1582) .......................................................................22,756
From Public Service Commission Fund (1607) ...........................................................1,101,021
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689) .............................................................2,676
From Office of Public Counsel Fund (1508) ..................................................................127,348
For the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................29,516
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations – Commission on
Human Rights Federal Fund (1117) .....................................................................13,904
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Administrative
Fund (1122) .............................................................................................................5,360
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ...................................................................492,508
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) ................................100,009
For the Department of Public Safety
Expense and Equipment
From State Emergency Management (1145) ....................................................................10,039
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) ..........................159,554
100 From Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control Fund (1544) .......................................153,073
101 From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus Fund
102 (2350) ..................................................................................................................228,191
103 For the Department of Public Safety
104 For the State Highway Patrol
105 Expense and Equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2013 5
106 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................247,526
107 From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) .................................................10,716
108 From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ...........................3,645,961
109 For the Department of Public Safety
110 For the Missouri Gaming Commission
111 Expense and Equipment
112 From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ........................................................................539,334
113 For the Department of the National Guard
114 Expense and Equipment
115 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................61,329
116 From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ..............................................................1,474,146
117 From Federal Drug Seizure Fund (1194) ..........................................................................29,124
118 For the Department of Corrections
119 Expense and Equipment
120 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................7,813,957
121 From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ..............................................................332,708
122 For the Department of Mental Health
123 Expense and Equipment
124 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,815,014
125 For the Department of Health and Senior Services
126 Expense and Equipment
127 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,507,415
128 From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................2,943,294
129 From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus Fund
130 (2350) ...............................................................................................................1,613,680
131 From Missouri Veterans’ Health and Care Fund (1606) ..................................................20,230
132 From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) ............................182,070
133 For the Department of Social Services
134 Expense and Equipment
135 From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $800,000 one-time) .......................13,167,073
136 From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................6,079,229
137 For the General Assembly
138 Expense and Equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2013 6
139 From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................................1
140 For the Lieutenant Governor
141 Expense and Equipment
142 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................62,160
143 From Missouri Arts Council Trust Fund (1262) ...............................................................81,369
144 For the Attorney General
145 Expense and Equipment
146 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................617,814
147 From Attorney General – Federal Fund (1136) ..............................................................179,650
148 From Merchandising Practices Revolving Fund (1631) .................................................154,038
149 From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ...................................................................114,326
150 From Workers’ Compensation – Second Injury Fund (1653) ........................................114,326
151 From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ..................................................................................9,737
152 From Missouri Office of Prosecution Services Fund (1680) ............................................94,875
153 For the Secretary of State
154 Expense and Equipment
155 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................335,145
156 From Local Records Preservation Fund (1577) ................................................................55,279
157 For the State Auditor
158 Expense and Equipment
159 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................17,527
160 For the Judiciary
161 Expense and Equipment
162 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,784,742
163 From Judiciary – Federal Fund (1137) .............................................................................27,572
164 From Judiciary Education and Training Fund (1847) .......................................... 175,913
165 Total .........................................................................................................................$63,228,092
Section 13.010. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For operation of state-owned facilities, utilities, systems furniture, and
structural modifications, provided fifteen percent (15%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 13.005, 13.010, and
13.015, further provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is
allowed between and within departments and one hundred

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2013 7
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between federal funds
within this section, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 13.025
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$630,856
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ..............................................................1,510,869
From Elementary and Secondary Education Federal Fund (1105) .................................519,776
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) ..........................266,735
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................364,763
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) ........................................................698,260
For the Department of Revenue
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,858,941
For the Office of Administration
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $6,304 one-time) .............................9,210,905
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) .......................................283,822
From Children’s Trust Fund (1694) ..................................................................................36,796
For the Department of Agriculture
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................234,471
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ....................................................53,358
From Animal Health Laboratory Fee Fund (1292) ...........................................................61,437
From Animal Care Reserve Fund (1295)............................................................................7,809
From Commodity Council Merchandising Fund (1406) ....................................................4,288
From Single-Purpose Animal Facilities Loan Program Fund (1408) .................................5,091
From State Milk Inspection Fee Fund (1645) .....................................................................5,607
From Grain Inspection Fee Fund (1647) ..........................................................................32,022
From Petroleum Inspection Fund (1662) ........................................................................163,153
From Missouri Wine and Grape Fund (1787) ...................................................................13,844
From Agriculture Development Fund (1904) .....................................................................2,529
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ......................................................................399,933

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2013 8
For the Department of Natural Resources
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,384,116
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .......................................389,632
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267) ......................................................65,697
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) .......................................................................107,879
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ..............................................................................................174,386
From Solid Waste Management Fund – Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) ..........................14,010
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) ...................................................................28,783
From Metallic Minerals Waste Management Fund (1575) .................................................5,560
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Asbestos Fee
Subaccount (1584) ..................................................................................................4,694
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1594) ..............................................................................................122,137
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ...................................................................47,586
From Energy Set-Aside Program Fund (1667) .................................................................42,206
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ................................................................................47,418
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) .........................................................................193,877
From Mined Land Reclamation Fund (1906) ...................................................................14,782
From Energy Futures Fund (1935) .....................................................................................1,518
For the Department of Conservation
Expense and Equipment
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ...............................................................331,036
For the Department of Economic Development
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................342,691
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) ...................................127,422
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund
(1547) ....................................................................................................................40,938
For the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Expense and Equipment
From Division of Credit Unions Fund (1548) ..................................................................43,218
From Division of Finance Fund (1550) ..........................................................................291,904
From Insurance Examiners Fund (1552) ..........................................................................48,113

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2013 9
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566) .........................................................................500,329
From Public Service Commission Fund (1607) ..............................................................180,042
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689) .........................................................374,291
For the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................180,514
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations – Commission on
Human Rights Federal Fund (1117) ...................................................................116,705
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Administrative
Fund (1122) .........................................................................................................645,402
From Division of Labor Standards - Federal Fund (1186) ...............................................10,363
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ...................................................................796,966
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) .............................1,286,883
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949) ............................................................97,766
For the Department of Public Safety
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $325,000 one-time) .........................1,048,576
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) ..........................227,219
From Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control Fund (1544) .......................................184,127
For the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
Expense and Equipment
100 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................903,298
101 From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ...........................1,208,946
102 For the Department of Public Safety
103 For the Missouri Gaming Commission
104 Expense and Equipment
105 From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ........................................................................120,015
106 For the Department of Corrections
107 Expense and Equipment
108 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,825,084
109 For the Department of Mental Health
110 Expense and Equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2013 10
111 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,350,656
112 From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ..............................................333,415
113 From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................................11,057
114 For the Department of Health and Senior Services
115 Expense and Equipment
116 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,926,075
117 From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund
118 (1143) ...............................................................................................................1,602,680
119 From Missouri Veterans’ Health and Care Fund (1606) ....................................................2,414
120 From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) ..............................60,251
121 For the Department of Social Services
122 Expense and Equipment
123 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................9,269,460
124 From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................183,878
125 From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................................24,466
126 From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................967,516
127 From Department of Social Services Educational Improvement Fund
128 (1620) ......................................................................................................................9,399
129 For the Governor
130 Expense and Equipment
131 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................810,148
132 For the Lieutenant Governor
133 Expense and Equipment
134 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................81,663
135 For the General Assembly
136 Expense and Equipment
137 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,830,718
138 For the Secretary of State
139 Expense and Equipment
140 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,093,341
141 From Secretary of State’s Technology Trust Fund Account (1266) .................................19,250
142 From Local Records Preservation Fund (1577) ................................................................10,440
143 From Investor Education and Protection Fund (1829) .....................................................39,479

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2013 11
144 For the State Auditor
145 Expense and Equipment
146 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................508,204
147 For the Attorney General
148 Expense and Equipment
149 From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $972,000 one-time) .........................1,782,978
150 From Attorney General – Federal Fund (1136) ..............................................................225,271
151 From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
152 Subaccount (1568) ................................................................................................34,158
153 From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) .....................................................................59,940
154 From Workers’ Compensation – Second Injury Fund (1653) ..........................................60,196
155 From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ................................................................................14,291
156 For the State Treasurer
157 Expense and Equipment
158 From State Treasurer’s General Operations Fund (1164) ...............................................277,614
159 For the Judiciary
160 Expense and Equipment
161 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 398,387
162 Total .........................................................................................................................$55,928,739
Section 13.015. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For operation of institutional facilities, utilities, systems furniture, and
structural modifications, provided fifteen percent (15%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 13.005, 13.010, and
13.015, further provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is
allowed between and within departments and one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between federal funds
within this section, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 13.025
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,550,513
For the Department of Mental Health
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................26,081,436

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2013 12
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ...........................................2,922,165
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................14,702
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ...........................11,712
For the Department of Social Services
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,694,828
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................1,078,052
For the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................7,983
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ................... 24,967
Total .........................................................................................................................$40,386,358
Section 13.020. To the Office of Administration
For the Office of Administration
For the collection of costs associated with state owned, institutional, and
state leased space occupied by non-state agencies, provided no
flexibility is allowed to or from this section
Expense and Equipment
From Office of Administration Revolving Administrative Trust Fund
(1505) .............................................................................................................$1,528,026
Section 13.025. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2013 13
Bill Totals
General Revenue Fund ...........................................................................................$111,103,421
Federal Funds .............................................................................................................29,429,349
Other Funds .......................................................................................................... 16,920,501
Total .......................................................................................................................$157,453,271
